Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 5
ANNUAL REPORTS - STATEMENT
OF PERSON NAMED IN FILED DOCUMENT

7-90-501. Periodic reports.

Each reporting entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a periodic report that states the entity name of the reporting entity, the jurisdiction under the law of which the reporting entity is formed, and:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2296, § 210, effective July 1, 2004.)

The registered agent name and registered agent address of the reporting entity's registered agent;

The principal office address of the reporting entity's principal office.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2296, § 210, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2296, § 210, effective July 1, 2004.)

The annual report shall be made in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state.

Repealed.

Unless otherwise elected as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c), a reporting entity shall deliver its first periodic report to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, no later than the last day of the second calendar month following the first anniversary of the calendar month in which the reporting entity's constituent filed document or statement of foreign entity authority, as the case may be, became effective or, in the case of a reporting entity that has been reinstated or that has cured its delinquency, no later than the last day of the second calendar month following the first anniversary of the calendar month in which the reinstatement or curing of delinquency occurred. Unless otherwise elected as provided in subparagraph (II) or (III) of this paragraph (c), thereafter, the periodic report shall be delivered to the secretary of state by each reporting entity annually.

[Editor's note: This version of subparagraph (II) is effective until ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)] The secretary of state may permit, on such conditions as the secretary of state may determine, a reporting entity to select an anniversary month different than the anniversary month as established in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of election of alternative anniversary month.

(II)

[

Editor's note: This version of subparagraph (II) is effective ninety days following certification by the secretary of state. (See the editor's note following this section.)

]

A reporting entity may, at the time of filing the constituent filed document or the periodic report, select an anniversary month different than the anniversary month as established in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c). If an entity elects to change its anniversary month pursuant to this subparagraph (II), that entity may not subsequently change its anniversary month for a period of at least one year.

The secretary of state may permit, on such conditions as the secretary of state may determine, a reporting entity to elect to file the periodic report required by this section biennially by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of election of biennial reporting.

Information in the periodic report shall be current as of the date the periodic report is delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, on behalf of the reporting entity. No periodic report shall state a delayed effective date.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 1843, § 98, effective July 1, 2002; p. 1707, § 96, effective October 1, 2002.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 1208, § 11, effective October 1, 2005.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 1208, § 11, effective October 1, 2005.)

(5.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1997, § 15, effective August 11, 2010.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1484, § 223, effective July 1, 2004.)

Each reporting entity that fails or refuses to deliver to the secretary of state a periodic report for filing on or before the due date prescribed by subsection (4) of this section and pay the prescribed processing fee is subject to a penalty, which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S.

(7.5) Beginning July 27, 2009, a domestic limited partnership formed under or governed by article 62 of this title that is not a reporting limited partnership may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of election to be a reporting entity stating:

The domestic entity name of the domestic limited partnership;

The principal office address of its principal office;

The registered agent name and registered agent address of its registered agent; and

That the domestic limited partnership elects to become a reporting limited partnership.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2296, § 210, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 971, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (4)(d), (4)(e), (5), and (6) amended, p. 1843, § 98, effective July 1; IP(1), (4)(d), (4)(e), (5), and (6) amended, p. 1707, § 96, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2296, § 210, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(4)(c), (4)(f), (6), and (7) amended, p. 1484, § 223, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(4), (5), (5.5), and (7) amended, p. 1208, § 11, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(4)(d), (5.5), and (7) amended, p. 873, § 54, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(7.5) added, p. 242, § 30, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

IP(1) amended, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1133, § 14, effective May 14.

L. 2010:

IP(1), (4)(c), (4)(d), (5.5), and (7) amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1997, § 15, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(4)(c)(II) amended, (SB 12-123), ch. 171, p. 614, § 7, effective (see editor's note).

Editor's note:

(1) Subsection (4)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (4)(b), effective January 1, 2002. (See L. 2000, p. 971.)

(2) Section 10 of chapter 171, Session Laws of Colorado 2012, provides that the act amending subsection (4)(c)(II) is effective ninety days following certification in writing by the secretary of state to the revisor of statutes that the secretary of state has implemented the necessary computer system changes to implement said subsection. As of publication date, the revisor of statutes had not received certification from the secretary of state.

7-90-502. Statement of person named in filed document. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 973, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 1843, § 99, effective July 1; IP(1) amended, p. 1708, § 97, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(b), and (1)(d) amended, p. 2297, § 211, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 1484, § 224, effective July 1.